District of Columbia statutes.
11-1746

Certification of copies of papers or documents filed in District of Columbia courts.

The Executive Officer shall provide that, if any person filing any paper or document in a District of Columbia court requests a certification of such filing, a copy of such paper or document provided by such person shall be appropriately marked for such person to show the time and date of such filing and the identity of the individual with whom such paper or document was filed. Such certified copy shall be prima facie evidence in any proceeding that the original of such paper or document was filed as shown by the certification.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 515, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-1746.
1973 Ed., § 11-1746.